src/phonology/sma-phon.twolc
!!€ buel%>%^1UMLa
!!€ bual%>0a

!!€ kliht%>%^1UMLan
!!€ klæht%>0an

!!€ jepts%>%^1UMLan
!!€ japts%>0an

!!€ gull%>%^1UMLan
!!€ gåll%>0an

!!€ gaevl%>%^1UMLan
!!€ gaavl%>0an

!!€ gået%>%^1UMLan
!!€ gåat%>0an

!!€ njuesl%>%^1UMLan
!!€ njuasl%>0an

"adj Umlaut oeh:an"
 å:u <=> [ #: | Cns+ ](%»:) _ a: Cns+ [ ([%>:|%»:]) %^3UML:0   ] ;


"Even syllabic verbs present sg, diphth ie-ea part 1" 
 i:e <=> [ #: | Cns+ ] _ e: Cns+ [
                                   [ Vow %»: [ Cns -[s|l] ] |
                                              %^aLATUS:    %»:            ] |
                                   [([%>:|%»:]) %^1UML:0                  ] |
                                   [(     %»: ) i: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ]
                                 ] ;
		Cns _ j %>: %^DISIMP: [e(m)|h|i|e n|e m i n i e] #: ;
		!Last context above: verbs ending -ijidh: Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2,
		! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Ind+Prt+Sg3, +ConNeg, +Imprt+Sg2, +Ger, +VGen

!!€ jieht%>%^1UMLa
!!€ jeaht%>0a

!!$ jieht%>%^1UMLa
!!$ jieht%>0a

!!€ sjiell%>%^1UMLan
!!€ sjeall%>0an


! gåetie -> gåatetje
!!€ gået^aLATUS»tje^DISIMP
!!€ gåate»tje0

! [Cns|#:] constraint is to avoid collission with diphthong contexts
"Even syllabic verbs Sg3 + PrfPtc E II"
 Vx:Vy <=> [ Cns | #: ] _ Cns+ (Vow) [ %>: | %»: ] %^2UML: ;
 	where Vx in (æ a å)
 	      Vy in (y o o)
 	matched ;

!!€ gælj%>%^2UMLe
!!€ gylj%>0e

!!€ færhtje%>%^2UMLse
!!€ fyrhtje%>0se

!!€ hahtje%>%^2UMLse
!!€ hohtje%>0se

!!€ rånhtje%>%^2UMLse
!!€ ronhtje%>0se

!!$ færhtje%>%^2UMLse
!!$ færhtje%>0se

!!$ hahtje%>%^2UMLse
!!$ hahtje%>0se

!!$ rånhtje%>%^2UMLse
!!$ rånhtje%>0se

! "o Deletion verbs Sg3 - PrfPtc II"
! o:0 <=> %>: %^2UML: _ e  ;

! "e Deletion" 	
! e:0 <=> o _ (Dummy:) %>: [b|d]; ! Dummy being %^2UML



"Even syllabic verbs Sg3 + PrfPtc ea-yö II a"
 e:y <=>                  _ a: Cns+ (Vow) [ %>: | %»: ]               %^2UML: ;
         [ #: | #: Cns+ ] _ a: Cns+              (%»:) o: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ;


"Even syllabic verbs Sg3 + PrfPtc ea-yö II b"
 a:ö <=>                  e: _ Cns+ (Vow) [ %>: | %»: ]               %^2UML: ;
         [ #: | #: Cns+ ] e: _ Cns+              (%»:) o: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ;

!!€ tjear%>%^2UMLe
!!€ tjyör%>0e

!!$ tjear%>%^2UMLe
!!$ tjear%>0e

!!€ bearke%>%^2UMLse
!!€ byörke%>0se

!!$ bearke%>%^2UMLse
!!$ bearke%>0se

!!€ mearhtje%>%^2UMLse
!!€ myörhtje%>0se

!!$ mearhtje%>%^2UMLse
!!$ mearhtje%>0se

"Even syllabic verbs Sg3 + PrfPtc aa-åå åa-åå II"
 a:å <=> [a:|å:] _    Cns+ (Vow) [ %>: | %»: ] %^2UML: ; 
                 _ a: Cns+ (Vow) [ %>: | %»: ] %^2UML: ; 

!aa åa
!åå åå

!!€ haare%>%^2UMLse
!!€ hååre%>0se

!!$ haare%>%^2UMLse
!!$ haare%>0se

!!€ råafe%>%^2UMLse
!!€ rååfe%>0se

!!$ råafe%>%^2UMLse
!!$ råafe%>0se


"Even syllabic verbs Sg3 ï-æ IV"
 Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns+ [ %>: | %»: ] %^3sUML: ;
 	where Vx in (ï o)
 	      Vy in (æ å)
 	matched ;

! Verbs like: mïnnedh, jovkedh

!!€ mïnn%>%^3sUMLa
!!€ mænn%>0a

!!€ jovk%>%^3sUMLa
!!€ jåvk%>0a

"1st rule for even syllabic verbs Sg3 ïe-ea IV"
 Vx:Vy <=> [ Cns | #: ] _ e: Cns+ [ %>: | %»: ] %^3sUML: ;
	where Vx in (ï o)
	      Vy in (e u)
	matched ;

"2nd rule for even syllabic verbs Sg3 ïe-ea IV, and for general a Umlaut"
 e:a <=>        [ï:|o:] _ Cns+ [ %>: | %»: ] %^3sUML: ;
   [ #: | Cns+ ] i:     _ Cns+ [
                                   [ Vow %»: [ Cns -[s|l] ] | %^aLATUS: %»: ] |
                                   [ ([%>:|%»:])                %^1UML:0    ] |
                                   [ (     %»: ) i: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML:  ]
                                ] ; ! Even syllabic verbs present sg, 
                                    ! diphth ie-ea part 2
   [ #: | Cns+ ] [å|a|u] _ Cns+ [
                                   [ Vow %»: [ Cns -[s|l] ] | %^aLATUS: %»: ] |
                                   [ ([%>:|%»:]) %^1UML:0 ]|
                                   [ (     %»: ) i: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ]
                                ] ; ! Even verbs pres sg, and nouns, 
                                    ! diphth ae-aa, åe-åa, ue-ua
   [#: | #: Cns+]([å|a]) _ Cns+ %»: %^htjidhUML: e h t j ;
   (%»:)         i:      _ Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ;


! Verbs like: tjïeledh, roehtedh

!!€ tjïel%>%^3sUMLa
!!€ tjeal%>0a

!!€ roeht%>%^3sUMLa
!!€ ruaht%>0a


"Even syllabic verbs Du1Pl3 IV"
 Vx:Vy <=> [ Cns (%»: %^adteUML:) | #: ] [å|a] _     Cns+ [ %>: | %»: ] 	  %^3dUML: ;
           [ Cns (%»: %^adteUML:) | #: ]       _ (e) Cns+ [ %>: | %»: ] 	  %^3dUML: ;           
           												        [ %»: ] _ v v %^3dUML: ; ! Passiv av likestava GOLTELIDH-verb
	where Vx in (ï a o)
	      Vy in (i e u)
	matched ;
	
!!€ mïnn%>%^3dUMLien
!!€ minn%>0ien

!!€ bark%>%^3dUMLien
!!€ berk%>0ien

!!€ jovk%>%^3dUMLien
!!€ juvk%>0ien


!!€ tjïek%>%^3dUMLien
!!€ tjiek%>0ien

!!€ dïjveld»ovv%^3dUMLieh
!!€ dïjveld»uvv0ieh

! $ = negativ test = det vi _ikkje_ vil ha
!!$ dïjveld%»ovv%^3dUMLieh
!!$ dïjveld»ovv0ieh


! prob delete this after testing
! " verbs Sg3 + PrfPtc ÅÅ II"
!  a:å <=> _ a:å Cns+ o:0 e: %^2UML: ;




! Umlaut rules for even-syll past tense


"ie:ee and ae:ee past tense"
Vx:e <=> _ e Cns* [ %>: | %»: ] %^iUML: ;
	where Vx in ( a i );

!!€ jieht%>%^iUMLim
!!€ jeeht%>0im

!!€ tjael%>%^iUMLim
!!€ tjeel%>0im


"åe:öö and ue:öö past tense I"
Vx:ö <=> _ e: Cns* [ %>: | %»: ] %^iUML: ;
	where Vx in ( u å o ) ;

"åe:öö and ue:öö past tense II"
e:ö <=> [ å: | u: | o: ] _ Cns* [ %>: | %»: ] %^iUML: ;

!!€ bået%>%^iUMLim
!!€ bööt%>0im

!!€ vuejn%>%^iUMLim
!!€ vööjn%>0im

!"e:i past tense, (MAJA:which is e:e)"
!  e:i <=> [ #: | Cns+ ] _ Cns* [ %>: | %»: ] %^iUML: ;

! !€ heps%>%^iUMLim
! !€ hips%>0im

! !€ gesn%>%^iUMLim
! !€ gisn%>0im



"a-Latus as e in 3-syllable words"
%^aLATUS:e <=> _ ( %»: ) :Cns+ ( %>: ) (:Vow+) ( %>: ) %^DISIMP: [ :Cns*                   |
                                                                   :Cns* :Vow              |
                                                                   :Cns* :Vow+ g u j m i e
                                                                 ] #: ;

! maana -> maanetje
!!€ maan%^aLATUS%»tje%^DISIMP
!!€ maane»tje0

!!$ maan%^aLATUS%»tje%^DISIMP
!!$ maana»tje0

! maanatjasse
!!€ maan%^aLATUS%»tj%>asse
!!€ maana»tj%>asse

!!$ maan%^aLATUS%»tj%>asse
!!$ maane»tj%>asse

! Umlaut rules for even-syll short passive
! All Umlaut rows R1-R6 gets umlauted to R5 in short passives

"Short passive Umlaut Column 1"
Vx:y <=> _ Cns+ %»:  %^PASSUML: ;
         where Vx in (i ï æ) ;

! bissedh -> byssedh
!!€ biss»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ byss»0edh

! sïrredh -> syrredh
!!€ sïrr»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ syrr»0edh

!!$ sïrr»%^PASSUMLedh
!!$ sïrr»0edh


! gæljodh > gyljedh
!!€ gælj»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ gylj»0edh

!!$ gælj»%^PASSUMLedh
!!$ gælj»0edh


"Short passive Umlaut Column 2"
Vx:o <=> [ Cns (%»: %^adteUML:) | #: ] _ Cns+ %»: %^PASSUML: ;
         where Vx in (a e) ;

! bestedh -> bostedh
!!€ best»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ bost»0edh

!!$ best»%^PASSUMLedh
!!$ best»0edh

! darjodh -> dorjedh
!!€ darj»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ dorj»0edh

!!$ darj»%^PASSUMLedh
!!$ darj»0edh


"Short passive Umlaut Column 3"
Vx:o <=> _ Cns+ %»: %^PASSUML: ;
         where Vx in (u å) ;

! juhtedh -> johtedh
!!€ juht»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ joht»0edh

!!$ juht»%^PASSUMLedh
!!$ juht»0edh

! gåhpodh -> gohpedh
!!€ gåhp»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ gohp»0edh

!!$ gåhp»%^PASSUMLedh
!!$ gåhp»0edh

! govledh -> govledh
!!€ govl»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ govl»0edh

"Short passive Umlaut Column 4 - part 1"
Vx:y <=> _ [ a: | e: ] Cns+ %»: %^PASSUML: ;
         where Vx in (e i ï) ;
         !

"Short passive Umlaut Column 4 - part 2"
Vx:ö <=> [ e: | i: | ï: ] _ Cns+ %»: %^PASSUML: ;
         where Vx in (a e) ;

!«sosialïsme MIMO»  ï -> i 
!LE 
! ^MI

! viedtedh -> vyödtedh
!!€ viedt»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ vyödt»0edh

!!$ viedt»%^PASSUMLedh
!!$ viedt»0edh

! tjearodh -> tjyöredh
!!€ tjear»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ tjyör»0edh

!!$ tjear»%^PASSUMLedh
!!$ tjear»0edh

! bïepmedh - byöpmedh
!!€ bïepm»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ byöpm»0edh

!!$ bïepm»%^PASSUMLedh
!!$ bïepm»0edh

"Short passive Umlaut Column 5 - part 1"
a:å  <=>                        _ [ a: | e: ] Cns+  %»:                 %^PASSUML: ;
         [ #: | #: Cns+ ] [a|å] _             Cns+ (%»:) o: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ;
         [ #: | #: Cns+ ]       _   a         Cns+ (%»:) o: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ;

! daejredh -> dååjredh
!!€ daejr»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ dååjr»0edh

! gaatodh - gååtedh
!!€ gaat»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ gååt»0edh

"Short passive Umlaut Column 5, 6, 7 part 2" ! No rule needed for column 6 part 1
Vx:å <=> [ a: | u: | o: | å: ] _ Cns+ %»: %^PASSUML: ;
         where Vx in (a e) ;

! åadtjodh - åådtjedh
!!€ gaat»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ gååt»0edh

! åestedh -> ååstedh
!!€ åest»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ ååst»0edh

"Short passive Umlaut Column 7 - part 1"
Vx:å <=> _ [ a: | e: ] Cns+ %»: %^PASSUML: ;
         where Vx in (   u o) ;
!         where Vx in (a u o) ; ! Removed a, since it conflicts with the rule
                                ! "Short passive Umlaut Column 5 - part 1" above

! vuejnedh - vååjnedh
!!€ vuejn»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ vååjn»0edh

! guarkedh -> gåårkedh
!!€ guark»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ gåårk»0edh

! våajodh -> vååjedh
!!€ våaj»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ vååj»0edh

! voessjedh - vååssjedh
!!€ voessj»%^PASSUMLedh
!!€ vååssj»0edh


"Der/htjidh Umlaut i(e):ï(e) and u(e):o(e)"
Vx:Vy <=> [ #: | #: Cns+ ] _ (e) Cns+ %»: %^htjidhUML: e h t j ;
 	where Vx in (i u)
 	      Vy in (ï o)
 	matched ;

!bueledh->boelehtjidh
!!€ buel»%^htjidhUMLehtjidh
!!€ boel»0ehtjidh

!!$ buel»%^htjidhUMLehtjidh
!!$ buel»0ehtjidh


!paekedh->paakehtjidh
!!€ paek»%^htjidhUMLehtjidh
!!€ paak»0ehtjidh

!!$ paek»%^htjidhUMLehtjidh
!!$ paek»0ehtjidh





"Der/didh Umlaut for GUARKEDH-words Column 4 ea:ïe and Column 7 ua:oe part 1"
Vx:Vy <=> _ a: Cns+ %»: %^didhUML: e [d|l] ;
 	where Vx in (e u)
 	      Vy in (ï o)
 	matched ;


! veajedh - vïejedidh
!!€ veaj»%^didhUMLedidh
!!€ vïej»0edidh

!!$ veaj»%^didhUMLedidh
!!$ veaj»0edidh

! guarkedh - goerkedidh
!!€ guark»%^didhUMLedidh
!!€ goerk»0edidh

!!$ guark»%^didhUMLedidh
!!$ guark»0edidh

"Der/didh Umlaut for GUARKEDH-words Column 1 æ:ï and Column 3 å:o"
Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns+ %»: %^didhUML: e [d|l] ;
   where Vx in (æ å)
         Vy in (ï o)
   matched ;

! skælkedh - skïlkedidh
!!€ skælk»%^didhUMLedidh
!!€ skïlk»0edidh

!!$ skælk»%^didhUMLedidh
!!$ skælk»0edidh

!!!plåtjkedh - plotjkedidh
!!€ plåtjk»%^didhUMLedidh
!!€ plotjk»0edidh

!!$ plåtjk»%^didhUMLedidh
!!$ plåtjk»0edidh



"Der/adte Umlaut for oe-verbs Column 1 æ:y, Column 2 a:o and Column 3 å:o"
Vx:Vy <=> [ #: | #: Cns+ ] _ Cns+ (%»:) o: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ;
 	where Vx in (æ a å)
 	      Vy in (y o o)
 	matched ;


!båetedh - båetiestidh - båatastalledh
!!€ bået»iest»%^adteUMLalledh
!!€ båat»0ast»0alledh

!!$ bået»iest»%^adteUMLalledh
!!$ bået»0ast»0alledh

!!$ bået»iest»%^adteUMLalledh
!!$ båat»iest»0alledh


!tjearodh - tjearoelidh - tjyöreladtedh
!!€ tjear»oel»%^adteUMLadtedh
!!€ tjyör»0el»0adtedh

!!$ tjear»oel»%^adteUMLadtedh
!!$ tjear»0el»0adtedh

!!$ tjear»oel»%^adteUMLadtedh
!!$ tjyör»oel»0adtedh




! Lexical test suites - infinitives
! =================================

!!€ dåeriedi%>dh
!!€ dåeriedi%>dh

!!€ bisse%>dh
!!€ bisse%>dh

!!€ belte%>dh
!!€ belte%>dh

!!€ buhtje%>dh
!!€ buhtje%>dh

!!€ paeke%>dh
!!€ paeke%>dh

!!€ båete%>dh
!!€ båete%>dh

!!€ buele%>dh
!!€ buele%>dh

!!€ æbjo%>dh
!!€ æbjo%>dh

!!€ hajko%>dh
!!€ hajko%>dh

!!€ gåhpo%>dh
!!€ gåhpo%>dh

!!€ tjearo%>dh
!!€ tjearo%>dh

!!€ baajsko%>dh
!!€ baajsko%>dh

!!€ gåaro%>dh
!!€ gåaro%>dh

!!€ skælke%>dh
!!€ skælke%>dh

!!€ skajke%>dh
!!€ skajke%>dh

!!€ plåtjke%>dh
!!€ plåtjke%>dh

!!€ sleapke%>dh
!!€ sleapke%>dh

!!€ snjåarke%>dh
!!€ snjåarke%>dh

!!€ sïrre%>dh
!!€ sïrre%>dh

!!€ sarje%>dh
!!€ sarje%>dh

!!€ sodte%>dh
!!€ sodte%>dh

!!€ skïerke%>dh
!!€ skïerke%>dh

!!€ slaapke%>dh
!!€ slaapke%>dh

!!€ snjåare%>dh
!!€ snjåare%>dh

!!€ tjoehpe%>dh
!!€ tjoehpe%>dh

!!€ skylle%>dh
!!€ skylle%>dh

!!€ aalhteroste%>dh
!!€ aalhteroste%>dh

!!€ skyöre%>dh
!!€ skyöre%>dh

!!€ vååjne%>dh
!!€ vååjne%>dh

!!€ skilhte%>dh
!!€ skilhte%>dh
